Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; SUPPORTIVE PARENTING SERVICES.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services shall seek federal authority to provide supportive parenting services to people eligible for personal care assistance under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.0659, or community first services and supports under Minnesota Statutes, section 256B.85. Supportive parenting services must be limited to assistance with the following age-appropriate activities of daily living for a child 12 years of age or younger: new text end new text begin (1) dressing, including assistance with choosing, application, and changing of clothing, and application of special appliances, wraps, or clothing; new text end new text begin (2) grooming, including assistance with: new text end new text begin (i) basic hair care; new text end new text begin (ii) oral care; new text end new text begin (iii) nail care, except for recipients who are diabetic or have poor circulation; new text end new text begin (iv) shaving; new text end new text begin (v) applying cosmetics and deodorant; and new text end new text begin (vi) care of eyeglasses and hearing aids; new text end new text begin (3) bathing, including assistance with basic personal hygiene and skin care; new text end new text begin (4) eating, including assistance with hand washing and application of orthotics required for eating, transfers, and feeding; new text end new text begin (5) transfers, including assistance with transferring the recipient from one seating or reclining area to another; new text end new text begin (6) mobility, including assistance with ambulation, such as use of a wheelchair. Mobility does not include providing transportation for a recipient; new text end new text begin (7) positioning, including assistance with positioning or turning a recipient for necessary care and comfort; and new text end new text begin (8) toileting, including assistance with bowel or bladder elimination and care including transfers, mobility, positioning, feminine hygiene, use of toileting equipment or supplies, cleansing the perineal area, inspection of the skin, and adjusting clothing. new text end new text begin (b) The provision of supportive parenting services listed under this section is effective January 1, 2026, or 90 days following federal approval, whichever is later. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER; SUPPORTIVE PARENTING SERVICES WAIVER AMENDMENT.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of human services shall seek an amendment to the 1915(c) home and community-based waivers identified in Minnesota Statutes, sections 256B.092, subdivision 5, and 256B.49, subdivision 11, to allow the following services to deliver supportive parenting services: new text end new text begin (1) assistive technology; new text end new text begin (2) family training and counseling; new text end new text begin (3) home modification; new text end new text begin (4) individualized home supports with training; new text end new text begin (5) respite; new text end new text begin (6) specialized equipment and supplies; and new text end new text begin (7) transportation. new text end new text begin (b) The provision of supportive parenting services must be limited to service functions that are: new text end new text begin (1) identified in a person's person-centered service plan or comparable plan of care; and new text end new text begin (2) provided to meet assessed needs of the person related to parenting supports. new text end new text begin (c) The provision of supportive parenting services listed under this section is effective January 1, 2026, or 90 days following federal approval, whichever is later. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end